District of Columbia statutes.
47-2851.03

Endorsement categories; exemptions.

(a)

Endorsements to a basic business license shall be issued in the following license endorsement categories:

(1)

Repealed.

(2)

Educational Services;

(3)

Entertainment;

(4)

Environmental Materials;

(5)

Financial Services;

(6)

(A)

Housing: Transient; and

(B)

Housing: Residential;

(7)

Inspected Sales and Services;

(8)

Manufacturing;

(9)

Motor Vehicle Sales, Service, and Repair;

(10)

(A)

Public Health: Health Care Facility;

(B)

Public Health: Human Services Facility;

(C)

Public Health: Child Health and Welfare;

(D)

Public Health: Public Accommodations;

(E)

Public Health: Pharmacy and Pharmacology;

(F)

Public Health: Funeral Establishment;

(G)

Public Health: Radioactive Materials;

(H)

Public Health: Biohazard;

(I)

Public Health: Food Establishment Wholesale; and

(J)

Public Health: Food Establishment Retail;

(11)

Public Safety;

(12)

Employment Services;

(13)

General Sales;

(14)

General Services and Repair; and

(15)

General Business.

(b)

All Class A or Class B license endorsements to master business licenses issued by the Department prior to the effective date of the Streamlining Regulation Emergency Act of 2003, passed on an emergency basis on July 8, 2003 (Enrolled version of Bill 15-317) [August 11, 2003], are hereby redesignated as license endorsements, without designation of class, to a basic business license. Nothing in the foregoing shall be read as eliminating the criteria, established either by rule or statute, that govern the awarding of any license endorsement affected by this section.

(c)

The Department shall maintain and periodically update a roster of all businesses which have been issued a basic business license, indicating the license endorsements appended to each basic business license.

(d)

The following licenses shall not be a part of the basic business license system and shall be regulated by the Department of Health:

(1)

Dog-Spayed; and

(2)

Dog-Unspayed.

History

Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 101(b), 45 DCR 1172
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2002(e), 46 DCR 3142
Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-38, § 2(e), 50 DCR 6913
Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-187, § 302(b), 51 DCR 6525

Section References

This section is referenced in § 25-313.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2851.3.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-38 rewrote the section.
D.C. Law 15-187 repealed par. (1) of subsec. (a) which had read as follows: “(1) Alcoholic beverages, except that a basic business license bearing an Alcoholic Beverages endorsement shall also indicate the class of endorsement applicable for the licensed business;”

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 116(l) of Mental Health Service Delivery Reform Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-144, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 9947).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(e) of Streamlining Regulation Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-145, August 11, 2003, 50 DCR 6896).